North Dakota statutes. TITLE 18 Fires
CHAPTER 18-06 Firefighting Equipment

18-06-01.
Township may purchase fire equipment — Election. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-02.
Notice of election. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-03.
Equipment must be purchased on competitive bids — Paid for out of general fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-04.
Two or more townships may purchase fire equipment jointly. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-05.
Equipment purchased jointly — Each board of supervisors to authorize clerk to advertise for bids. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-06.
Petition for tax levy for fire protection in unincorporated villages — Tax levy made. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-07.
Certification of amount of taxes levied — County auditor to fix rate — Extension. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-08.
Collection and payment of taxes — Separate account kept by township treasurer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-09.
Expenditures from funds — Payments made by warrants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 165, § 14.

18-06-10.
Township may contract for prevention and extinguishment of fires.

The electors of each township at the annual township meeting may authorize and empower the board of township supervisors to fund from revenues derived from the general fund levy authority of the township and provide by contract or otherwise for the prevention of, protection from, and extinguishment of fires within the township.

When so authorized, the supervisors may enter into a five-year contract and levy for the payment of the services obtained under the contract. The contract may be renewed or renegotiated for another five-year period upon authorization by the electors of the township at the annual meeting.

A voter-approved levy under this section authorized by electors of a township before January 1, 2015, remains in effect under the provisions of this section at the time the levy was authorized but not exceeding ten taxable years. Upon expiration of any mill levy under this section authorized by electors of a township before January 1, 2015, the governing body of the township or county may, by resolution, transfer any unobligated balance in the fund in which the levy proceeds were deposited to the general fund of the township.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 319, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 18-0610; S.L. 1969, ch. 226, § 1; 1983, ch. 606, § 26; 2015, ch. 439, § 20, effective January 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 20 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

18-06-11.
Contracts for fire protection in unorganized townships — Mill levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 340, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 18-0611; S.L. 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 46; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.